Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2262.07
Probation Program Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Probation Program Cash Fund is created. All funds collected pursuant to section 29-2262.06 shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the fund. Except as otherwise directed by the Supreme Court during the period from November 21, 2009, until June 30, 2013, the fund shall be utilized by the administrator for the purposes stated in subdivisions (14) and (17) of section 29-2252, except that the State Treasurer shall, on or before June 30, 2011, on such date as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services, transfer the amount set forth in Laws 2009, LB1, One Hundred First Legislature, First Special Session. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2003, LB 46, § 13;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 15;

Laws 2010, LB800, § 8;

Laws 2011, LB378, § 20;

Laws 2011, LB390, § 4;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 130.
April 8, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.